Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 162.07, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Estimates to be made if information not provided. In the event that any county deleted text begin shall faildeleted text end new text begin failsnew text end to submit the information deleted text begin provided for hereindeleted text end new text begin required under this sectionnew text end , the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end estimate the lane-mileage and the money needs of the county. Thenew text begin commissioner must use thenew text end estimate deleted text begin shall be useddeleted text end in determining the apportionment formula. The commissioner may withhold payment of the amount apportioned to the county until the information is submitted. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 162.08, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Allocation for cities having less than 5,000 population. new text begin (a) new text end Upon determining the sum of money to be apportioned to each county as deleted text begin hereinbeforedeleted text end providednew text begin under section 162.07new text end , the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end allocate a percentage of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end sum for expenditure solely on those portions of each county's county state-aid highways located within cities having a population of less than 5,000, according to the last federal decennial census, or, if incorporated during the ten-year period between federal decennial censuses, according to their incorporation census. new text begin (b)new text end The percentage deleted text begin sodeleted text end allocated deleted text begin shall equaldeleted text end new text begin under paragraph (a) for each county equalsnew text end the percentage that the total needs of the county state-aid highway system in deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin the applicablenew text end cities bears to the total county state-aid highway needs in deleted text begin eachdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end county. Money deleted text begin sodeleted text end allocated deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin under paragraph (a) mustnew text end be set apart and credited to the municipal account of each county.